Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5781.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 501. (1) A foreign credit union, other than a federal credit union, may conduct business as a credit union in this state only with the written approval of the commissioner. director. The commissioner director shall not grant approval unless the commissioner director finds that the foreign credit union meets all of the following requirements: (a) The credit union is organized under a law similar to this act. (b) The credit union is financially solvent. (c) The credit union has insurance through an agency of the federal government of member of its share and deposit accounts from a federal agency authorized to insure share and deposit accounts or from a qualified private insurance organization as that term is defined in section 387. (d) The credit union is examined and supervised by the supervisory authority of the state or territory in which it is organized. (e) The credit union conducts business in this state to adequately serve its members in this state. (2) The commissioner director shall not grant approval under subsection (1) unless the foreign credit union agrees in writing as a condition of the approval to do all of the following: (a) To charge a rate of interest that does not exceed any rate of interest permitted by under the credit reform act, 1995 PA 162, MCL 445.1851 to 445.1864, for a loan in this state by a domestic credit union. (b) Comply with the same consumer protection laws that a domestic credit union must comply with when making a loan or providing other services in this state. For purposes of this subdivision, a loan is made in this state if any person, other than a guarantor, while physically in this state, signed the loan agreement setting forth the terms and conditions of any obligation created or to be created under the agreement. For purposes of this subdivision, a service other than a loan is provided in this state if a person does not physically travel out of this state to obtain the service or if an agreement to provide the service is signed by a person in this state. (c) Designate and maintain an agent for the service of process in this state. (d) File any reports required by the commissioner.director. (e) Allow the commissioner director to conduct an examination, if necessary, to the same extent as the commissioner director is authorized to conduct examinations of domestic credit unions under article 2. (f) Meet any other requirements that the commissioner director requires of domestic credit unions under this act. (3) The commissioner director shall not grant approval under subsection (1) if the state or territory in which the credit union is organized does not permit credit unions organized in this state to do business in that state or territory. (4) This section does not exempt a foreign credit union from complying with the laws of this state to the extent compliance is otherwise required. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05525'25) or House Bill No. 5779 (request no. H05525'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05532'25) or House Bill No. 5780 (request no. H05532'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05544'25) or House Bill No. 5782 (request no. H05544'25). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06228'26) or House Bill No. 5783 (request no. H06228'26).